District of Columbia statutes.
50-2508

Acquisition and use of property.

(a)

All property conveyed to the Authority shall be conveyed in the name of the Authority.

(b)

The purpose for which property is leased and for which the privileges, permits, and concessions are granted may not be inconsistent with the use of the property for the purposes authorized by § 50-2503. Any lease or contract executed by the Authority shall contain a clause stating specifically the purpose for which the property is leased, or for which the permit, privilege, or concession is granted.

Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-153, § 9, 41 DCR 4652
This section is referenced in § 50-2507.
1981 Ed., § 40-848.